California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 tested in accordance with an approved research plan or by a registered hemp breeder and tested in accordance with an approved variety development plan, a registrant that grows industrial hemp under this section shall, before the harvest of each crop and as provided below, obtain a laboratory test report indicating the THC levels of a random sampling of the dried flowering tops of the industrial hemp grown.

(2) Sampling shall occur within the timeframe established by the department.

(3) The sample collected for THC testing shall be taken with the grower or hemp breeder present. The department shall establish, by regulation, the sampling procedures, including all of the following:

(A) The number of plants to be sampled per field, and any compositing of samples.

(B) The portions of the plant to be sampled.

(C) The plant parts to be included in a sample.

(D) Additional procedures as necessary to ensure accuracy and the sanitation of samples and fields.

(4) The sample collected for THC testing shall be accompanied by the registrant’s proof of registration.

(5) The laboratory test report shall be issued by a laboratory approved by the department, using a department-approved testing method. The testing method shall use postdecarboxylation or similarly reliable methods for determining THC concentration levels. The laboratory test report shall indicate the percentage concentration of THC on a dry-weight basis, indicate the date and location of samples taken, and state the Global Positioning System
 coordinates and total acreage of the crop. If the laboratory test report indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is equal to or less than 0.3 percent, the words “PASSED AS CALIFORNIA INDUSTRIAL HEMP” shall appear at or near the top of the laboratory test report. If the laboratory test report indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is greater than 0.3 percent, the words “FAILED AS CALIFORNIA INDUSTRIAL HEMP” shall appear at or near the top of the laboratory test report. The laboratory test report shall also include an estimate of the measurement of uncertainty associated with the test results. A laboratory shall use appropriate, validated methods and procedures for all testing activities and estimates of the measurement of uncertainty.

(6) If the laboratory test report indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is equal to or less than 0.3 percent, the laboratory shall provide the person who requested the testing not less
 than 10 original copies signed by an employee authorized by the laboratory and shall retain one or more original copies of the laboratory test report for a minimum of two years from its date of sampling.

(7) If the laboratory test report indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is greater than 0.3 percent and does not exceed 1 percent, the registrant that grows industrial hemp shall submit additional samples for testing of the industrial hemp grown.

(8) A registrant that grows industrial hemp shall destroy or dispose of the industrial hemp grown upon receipt of a first laboratory test report indicating a percentage concentration of THC that exceeds 1 percent or a second laboratory test report pursuant to paragraph (7) indicating a percentage concentration of THC that exceeds 0.3 percent but is less than 1 percent. If the percentage concentration of THC exceeds 1 percent,
 the destruction or disposal shall begin within 48 hours, and be completed within seven days, after receipt of the laboratory test report. If the percentage concentration of THC in the second laboratory test report exceeds 0.3 percent but is less than 1 percent, the destruction or disposal shall take place as soon as practicable, but no later than 45 days after receipt of the second test report.

(9) A registrant that intends to grow industrial hemp and who complies with this section shall not be prosecuted for the cultivation or possession of marijuana as a result of a laboratory test report that indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is greater than 0.3 percent but does not exceed 1 percent.

(10) A registered established agricultural research institution or a registered hemp breeder shall obtain laboratory results in accordance with its approved research plan or variety
 development plan. The secretary may authorize a registered established agricultural research institution or hemp breeder to cultivate or possess industrial hemp with a laboratory test report that indicates a percentage concentration of THC that is greater than 0.3 percent in accordance with its approved research plan or variety development plan if that cultivation or possession contributes to the development of types of industrial hemp that will comply with the 0.3 percent THC limit established in this division.

(11) A registrant that grows industrial hemp shall retain an original signed copy of the laboratory test report for two years from its date of sampling, make an original signed copy of the laboratory test report available to the department, the commissioner, or law enforcement officials or their designees upon request, and shall provide an original copy of the laboratory test report to each person purchasing, transporting, or otherwise
 obtaining from the registrant that grows industrial hemp the fiber, oil, cake, or seed, or any component of the seed, of the plant.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 101) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 9.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81007.

(a) As part of the registration program established pursuant to this division, the department may establish and carry out, by regulation, an agricultural pilot program pursuant to Section 7606 of the federal Agricultural Act of 2014 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 5940) in accordance with the purposes of that section.

(b) This section shall remain operative only until the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)), and as of January 1 of the following year is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 10.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

81009.

Not later than January 1, 2019, or five years after the provisions of this division are authorized under federal law, whichever is later, the board, in consultation with the Hemp Industries Association, or its successor industry association, shall report the following to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Agriculture and the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety:

(a) The economic impacts of industrial hemp cultivation, processing, and product manufacturing in California.

(b) The economic impacts of industrial hemp cultivation, processing, and product manufacturing in other states that may have permitted industrial hemp cultivation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 398, Sec. 4.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2017, pursuant to Section 81010.)
-------------------------------------------

81010.

This division, and Section 221 shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 112.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64, making Division 24 (commencing with Section 81000) operative on January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

81011.

(a) Before cultivating industrial hemp, an established agricultural research institution shall provide the Global Positioning System coordinates of the planned cultivation site to the commissioner of the county in which the site is located.

(b) This section shall remain operative only until the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)), and as of January 1 of the following year is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 12.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

81012.

(a) Enforcement of the approved state plan shall comply with Section 297B(e) of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)).

(b) A grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder that the secretary determines has violated a provision of this division listed in the approved state plan or an additional requirement listed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 81015, including, but not limited to, by failing to provide a legal description of the land on which industrial hemp is grown, failing to register as required, or exceeding the 0.3 percent
 THC limit established in this division, shall be subject to the following consequences:

(1) For a negligent violation, as determined by the secretary, the consequences under state laws for a violation of this division shall be as follows:

(A) If the violation is not a repeat violation subject to subparagraph (B), the grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder shall comply with a corrective action plan, to be established by the secretary, that includes both of the following:

(i) A reasonable date by which the grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder shall correct the negligent violation.

(ii) A requirement that the grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder shall periodically report to the secretary, for a period of at least the next two calendar years, on its compliance with this division or the approved state plan.

(B) A grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder that commits a negligent violation three times in a five-year period shall be ineligible to participate in the industrial hemp program for a period of five years beginning on the date of the finding of the third violation.

(C) A grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural
 research institution, or hemp breeder shall not, as a result of a negligent violation, be subject to any criminal enforcement action by the state or a local government.

(2) For a violation committed intentionally, or with recklessness or gross negligence, the secretary shall immediately report the grower of industrial hemp, established agricultural research institution, or hemp breeder to the Attorney General of the United States and the Attorney General of this state, as applicable.

(c) This section shall become operative as of the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law
 115-334)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 50.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative on the date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

81013.

Any person convicted of a felony relating to a controlled substance under state or federal law before, on, or after January 1, 2020, shall be ineligible, during the 10-year period following the date of the conviction, to participate in the industrial hemp program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 12.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

81014.

A person that materially falsifies any information contained in an application or registration under Section 81003 or 81004, or other application to participate in the industrial hemp program, shall be ineligible to participate in the industrial hemp program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 13.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

81015.

(a) On or before May 1, 2020, the secretary, in consultation with the Governor and the Attorney General, shall develop and submit to the United States Secretary of Agriculture a state plan, consistent with this division, pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)), including a certification that the state has the resources and personnel to carry out the practices and procedures described in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive, of
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of that section.

(b) In an annex to the state plan, the secretary shall list the provisions of this division that are included in the state plan, and any additional requirements in the state plan, that shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to Section 81012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 14.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 25. FOOD LABELING [82000. - 82001.]

82000.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Quality date” means a date on a label affixed to the packaging or a container of food that communicates to consumers the date after which the food quality may begin to deteriorate but the food may still be acceptable for consumption.

(b) “Safety date” means a date on a label affixed to the packaging or container of food that communicates to consumers that the food should be consumed or frozen, if appropriate, by the date listed on the package that applies to perishable products with potential safety implications over time.

(c) “‘Sell by’ date” means a date on a label affixed to the packaging or container of food that is intended to communicate primarily to a distributor or retailer for purposes of stock rotation and that is not a quality date or a safety date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   (AB 954)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

82001.

(a) On and after July 1, 2026, a food manufacturer, processor, or retailer responsible for the labeling of food items for human consumption that chooses, or is otherwise required by law, to display a date label to communicate a quality or safety date on a food item manufactured on or after July 1, 2026, shall use one of the following uniform terms on the date label:

(1) “BEST if Used by,” “BEST if Used or Frozen
 by,” “Best if Used by,” or “Best if Used or Frozen by” to indicate the quality date of the food item.

(2) “USE by,” “USE by or Freeze by,” “Use by,” or “Use by or Freeze by” to
 indicate the safety date of the food item.

(3) “BB” to indicate the quality date of the food item if the food item is too small to include the uniform term described in paragraph (1) or if the food item is a beverage as defined in Section 14504 of the Public Resources Code.

(4) “UB” to indicate the safety date of the food item if the food item is too small to include the uniform term described in paragraph (2).

(b) (1) A person shall not sell or offer for sale in the state a food item for human consumption manufactured on or after July 1, 2026, that displays a quality or safety date label that is not labeled in accordance with subdivision (a).

(2) A person shall not sell or offer for sale in the state a food item for human consumption manufactured on or after July 1, 2026, that is labeled with the phrase “sell by.” This paragraph does not prohibit the use of “sell by” dates that are presented in a coded format that are not easily readable by consumers and that do not use the phrase “sell by.”

(c) (1) The department may accept nonstate funds from public and private sources to, on its internet website, educate consumers about the meaning of the quality dates and safety dates specified in this section.

(2) Funds accepted by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Consumer Education Account, which is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all funds in the Consumer Education Account are hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years to carry out the purpose provided in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) This section does not prohibit, and shall not be construed to discourage, the sale, donation, or use of food after the food’s quality date pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) has passed. A retail food facility may donate a food item for human consumption that is not labeled in accordance with this section.

(2) Unless otherwise required by law, this section shall not be construed to require the use or display of a date label on a food item for human
 consumption unless the food item displays a date label.

(3) This section does not prohibit the use or display of a label that allows consumers to view online information about a food item for human consumption.

(4) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), on and after July 1, 2026, a grocery store may display a label with the phrase “packed on” on a prepared food item and may sell or offer for sale in the state the prepared food item with that label if the prepared food item also displays a quality or safety date label in accordance with subdivision (a).

(5) This section does not prohibit a person from displaying on wine, a distilled spirit, or a wine- or distilled spirit-based product bottled or packaged on or
 after July 1, 2026, a label with a statement that communicates the date on which the wine, distilled spirit, or wine- or distilled spirit-based product was produced, manufactured, bottled, or packaged, or from selling or offering for sale in the state the wine, distilled spirit, or wine- or distilled spirit-based product with that label. The statement may use date formats, including, but not limited to, dates in a time, day, month, and year format and Julian dates.

(6) To the extent that any other law or a National Shellfish Sanitation Program provision governing the labeling of shellfish authorizes or requires the use of terms that conflict, or are inconsistent, with this section, this section does not apply.

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Infant formula.

(2) Eggs or pasteurized in-shell eggs.

(3) Beer and other malt beverages.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Food item for human consumption” does not include a dietary supplement as defined in Section 321(ff) of Title 21 of the
 United States Code.

(2) “Grocery store” means a store engaged in the retail sale of canned food, dry goods, fresh fruits and vegetables, and fresh meats, fish, and poultry and any area that is not separately owned within the store where food is prepared and served, including a bakery, deli, and meat and seafood counter.

(3) “Prepared food item” means a food item for human consumption prepared or repackaged on a grocery store’s premises, using any cooking or food preparation technique.

(g) If and to the extent that any provision of this section is preempted by federal law, the provision does not apply and shall not be enforced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   (AB 2779)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

